Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 1 of chapter 170 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
amended by adding the following 2 sentences:- Said property is bounded and described as
follows:
Beginning at a stone bound set at the northeasterly corner of the granted premises and in
the boundary line between land of the grantee and land now or formerly of Lincoln H. and Ruth
I. Breault, as shown on the plan hereinafter mentioned
THENCE the line runs south 4º 25’ west by said land of the grantee one hundred eleven
(111) feet to a stone bound at land of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts;
of 3

THENCE north 5º 35’ west by said land of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts one
hundred four (104) feet to a point at land now or formerly of Lincoln H. and Ruth I Breault;
THENCE northeasterly by a line curving to the right with a radius of four hundred thirty-
five (435) feet by said land of Lincoln H. and Ruth I. Breault twenty (20) feet to the point of
beginning.
Containing 1,000 square feet, more or less and being shown on a plan entitled
“Commonwealth of Massachusetts, Metropolitan District Commission, Water Division, Land in
Marlboro to be conveyed to Pierina Monti,***February 1958, Harold J. Toole, Director of Water
Division and Chief Water Supply Engineer,” to be recorded herewith.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 170 is hereby further amended by adding the following 3
sections:-
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding the absence of a recorded deed or any defect in execution
or delivery, the conveyance of the parcel of land described in section 1 from the commonwealth
to Pierina Monti dated May 22, 1958, is hereby validated, confirmed and ratified and shall be
deemed to have been validly made and effective as of May 22, 1958. Said conveyance shall have
the same force and effect as if a deed had been properly executed, delivered and recorded at the
time of the original transaction, notwithstanding any defects, irregularities or omissions in the
original conveyance or the failure to record the same.
SECTION 4. The Middlesex southern district registry of deeds is hereby authorized and
directed to accept for recording the confirmatory deed authorized in section 1, together with any
supporting documentation relating to the May 22, 1958 conveyance including a copy of the deed
dated May 22, 1958 intending to convey the parcel of land described in subsection (b) of section
of 3

1 herein kept by the division of capital asset management and maintenance in its official records
and in ordinary course certified by an official from said division as being a true and correct copy
of said May 22, 1958 deed, notwithstanding any requirement of law, rule or regulation that
would otherwise prevent such recording. Any such supporting documentation shall be attached
to an affidavit conforming to the requirements of section 5B of chapter 183 of the General Laws.
Upon recording the confirmatory deed and supporting documentation, said confirmatory deed
shall be deemed to relate back to and shall be effective as of May 22, 1958, and shall serve as
conclusive evidence of the commonwealth's conveyance of said parcel to Pierina Monti and her
heirs, successors and assigns.
SECTION 5. Upon the recording of the confirmatory deed authorized herein, the title to
said parcel shall be deemed to have been vested in Pierina Monti as of May 22, 1958, and to
have passed through any successive conveyances to the current owner of record, free and clear of
any claims by the commonwealth arising from the absence of a recorded deed for the 1958
conveyance. This act shall be conclusive evidence of the validity of said conveyance and shall
cure any defects in the chain of title arising from the failure to record the original 1958
conveyance.
of 3